Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 7. Absentee Voting.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 57.

§ 24.2-700.
Persons entitled to vote by absentee ballot.

Any registered voter may vote by absentee ballot in accordance with the provisions of this chapter in any election in which he is qualified to vote.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-319; 1952, c. 488; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-227; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1988, c. 6; 1989, c. 320; 1993, cc. 414, 641; 1995, c. 157; 1998, c. 254; 2000, c. 378; 2001, c. 631; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2008, cc. 425, 880; 2009, cc. 405, 873; 2010, c. 244; 2012, c. 353; 2017, c. 631; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 561, 1149, 1151, 1201.

Cross references.

As to permitted use of paper ballots, see §

24.2-646.1

.

As to special annual applications for absentee ballots for certain ill or disabled voters, see §

24.2-703.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 414 amended former § 24.1-227, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1993, c. 414.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “institution of higher education” was substituted for “institution of learning” in subdivision 3 to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed enactment clause 2 of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 378 deleted “or” from the end of subdivision 7, added “or” to the end of subdivision 8, and added subdivision 9.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 631 inserted “and commuting to and from his home to his place of work” in subdivision 9.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and substituted “who temporarily resides outside” for “regularly employed in a business, profession or occupation outside the continental limits” in clause (iii) of subdivision 2.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 425, in subdivision 4, added “or pregnancy” and made a related change.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880 substituted “duly registered person with a disability, as defined in §

24.2-101

” for “person” and “physical disability or physical illness” for “his disability or illness” in subdivision 4.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 405 and 873 are identical, and added subdivision 10 and made related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 244 added subdivision 11; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 353 rewrote subdivision 2, and made stylistic changes in subdivision 9.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 631 added subdivision 12 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 561 updated a statutory reference in former subsection A.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and deleted former subsection A, which set out the ways in which voters could be qualified to vote by absentee ballot.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-701.
Application for absentee ballot.

The Department shall furnish each general registrar with a sufficient number of applications for official absentee ballots. The registrars shall furnish applications to persons requesting them.The Department shall implement a system that enables eligible persons to request and receive an absentee ballot application electronically through the Internet. Electronic absentee ballot applications shall be in a form approved by the State Board.Except as provided in §

24.2-703

or

24.2-703.1

, a separate application shall be completed for each election in which the applicant offers to vote. An application for an absentee ballot may be accepted the later of (i) 12 months before an election or (ii) the day following any election held in the twelfth month prior to the election in which the applicant is applying to vote.An application that is completed in person at the same time that the applicant registers to vote shall be held and processed no sooner than the fifth day after the date that the applicant registered to vote; however, this requirement shall not be applicable to any covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

.Any application received before the ballots are printed shall be held and processed as soon as the printed ballots for the election are available.For the purposes of this chapter, the general registrar’s office shall be open a minimum of eight hours between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on the first and second Saturday immediately preceding all elections.Unless the applicant is disabled, all applications for absentee ballots shall be signed by the applicant who shall state, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that to the best of his knowledge and belief the facts contained in the application are true and correct and that he has not and will not vote in the election at any other place in Virginia or in any other state. If the applicant is unable to sign the application, a person assisting the applicant will note this fact on the applicant signature line and provide his signature, name, and address.

Applications for absentee ballots shall be completed in the following manner:

An application completed in person shall be completed only in the office of the general registrar and signed by the applicant in the presence of a registrar. The applicant shall provide one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

, or if he is unable to present one of the specified forms of identification listed in that subsection, he shall sign a statement, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be. An applicant who requires assistance in voting by reason of a physical disability or an inability to read or write, and who requests assistance pursuant to §

24.2-649

, may be assisted in preparation of this statement in accordance with that section. The provisions of §

24.2-649

regarding voters who are unable to sign shall be followed when assisting a voter in completing this statement. Any applicant who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

or does not sign this statement shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. The State Board of Elections shall provide instructions to the general registrar for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to §

24.2-653.01

and this section.This paragraph shall apply in the case of any individual who is required by subparagraph (b) of 52 U.S.C. § 21083 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to show identification the first time he votes in a federal election in the state. At such election, such individual shall present (i) a current and valid photo identification or (ii) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter. Such individual who desires to vote in person but does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this paragraph shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. The identification requirements of subsection B of §

24.2-643

and subsection A of §

24.2-653

shall not apply to such voter at such election. The Department of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to §

24.2-653.01

and this section.

Any other application may be made by mail, by electronic or telephonic transmission to a facsimile device if one is available to the office of the general registrar or to the office of the Department if a device is not available locally, or by other means. The application shall be on a form furnished by the registrar or as specified in subdivision 3. The application shall be made to the appropriate registrar no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day prior to the election in which the applicant offers to vote.

The application of any covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

, may be on a federal postcard application, as defined in §

24.2-452

. The federal postcard application may be accepted the later of (i) 12 months before an election or (ii) the day following any election held in the twelfth month prior to the election in which the applicant is applying to vote.

Applications for absentee ballots shall contain the following information:

The applicant’s printed name and the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number. However, an applicant completing the application in person shall not be required to provide the last four digits of his social security number;

A statement that he is registered in the county or city in which he offers to vote and his residence address in such county or city. Any person temporarily residing outside the United States shall provide the last date of residency at his Virginia residence address, if that residence is no longer available to him. Any covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

, who is not a registered voter may file the applications to register and for a ballot simultaneously; and

The complete address to which the ballot is to be sent directly to the applicant, unless the application is made in person at a time when the printed ballots for the election are available and the applicant chooses to vote in person at the time of completing his application. The address given shall be (i) the address of the applicant on file in the registration records; (ii) the address at which he will be located while absent from his county or city; or (iii) the address at which he will be located while temporarily confined due to a disability or illness. No ballot shall be sent to, or in care of, any other person.

An application shall not be required for any registered voter appearing in person to cast an absentee ballot pursuant to §

24.2-701.1

.

History.

Code 1950, § 24.1-228; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-228.1; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, cc. 620, 621; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 461; 1988, c. 8; 1989, c. 320; 1992, c. 288; 1993, cc. 414, 641; 1996, c. 295; 1998, c. 254; 2000, cc. 378, 863; 2001, cc. 621, 631, 793; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2003, c. 478; 2004, c. 410; 2006, c. 438; 2007, c. 315; 2008, cc. 386, 425, 880; 2009, cc. 405, 873; 2010, c. 244; 2011, cc. 427, 458; 2012, cc. 353, 612, 838, 839; 2013, cc. 535, 620, 725; 2015, cc. 314, 644, 645; 2017, c. 631; 2018, c. 595; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 289, 735, 1064, 1065, 1149, 1151, 1201.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 414 amended former § 24.1-228.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given in this section, as set out above. In accordance with c. 414, the amendment, in subsection C, added “or” at the end of subdivision 10, and added subdivision 11.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, cc. 353 and 612, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated June 26, 2012.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2012, c. 839, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated August 20, 2012. Acts 2012, c. 838 was deemed superseded by Acts 2012, c. 839 and was not submitted for preclearance.

Acts 2013, c. 703, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, provided an appropriation providing for a voter outreach or public information program and otherwise effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed during the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly that becomes law.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2013, c. 725, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided in Acts 2013, c. 806.

The 2013 acts were subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. However, on June 25, 2013, the United States Supreme Court held invalid Section 4 of the Voting Rights Act that outlines the formula for determining what jurisdictions are covered under the section 5 preclearance processes. See Shelby County v. Holder, — U.S. —, 133 S. Ct. 2612, 186 L. Ed 2d 651, 2013 U.S. LEXIS 4917 (2013).

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20301(b)(2)” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff(b)(2)” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “higher education, the name of the school or institution of higher education” was substituted for “learning, the name of the school or institution of learning” in subdivision C 5 to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

Acts 2020, c. 561 amended former subdivision C 14 by updating a reference. Subdivision C 14 was deleted by Acts 2020, cc. 1149, 1151, 1201.

Acts 2020, cc. 1064 and 1065, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 378 added “or” to the end of subdivision C 12 and added subdivision C 13.

The 2000 amendment by c. 863 inserted “except those submitted pursuant to §

24.2-703

,” in the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 621 substituted “a person assisting the applicant will note this fact on the applicant signature line and provide his signature, name, and address” for “the witness will note this fact on the applicant signature line” in the last sentence of the paragraph of subsection A.

The 2001 amendment by c. 631, in subdivision C 13, inserted “and commuting to and from his home to his place of work,” and inserted “and commuting” preceding “on election day.”

The 2001 amendment by c. 793 substituted the present last sentence in the third paragraph of subsection A for the former next to last sentence in the paragraph, which read: “No application, except those submitted pursuant to §

24.2-703

, shall be accepted more than ten months prior to the election for which the ballot is requested,” and indented the former last sentence in that paragraph as the present fourth paragraph in the subsection; and in the present fifth paragraph in subsection A, substituted “all general elections, except May general elections held in towns,”for all general or primary elections,” and inserted “primary election, May general election held in a town, or” preceding “special election” at the end of the paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are almost identical, and substituted “that” for “which” preceding “enables” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A; in subdivision B 1, substituted “a member” for “the secretary” in the second sentence, and added the last two sentences; in subdivision C 2, inserted the present second sentence, and deleted “and who is entitled to register by absentee application pursuant to §

24.2-419

” following “voter” in the last sentence. Chapter 819 also deleted former subdivision C 5, and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 478 substituted “11” for “eleven,” “12” for “twelve,” and “13” for “thirteen” throughout the section; and in subdivision C 3, in the first sentence substituted “unless” for “provided that,”deleted “not” following “application is,” and inserted “and the applicant chooses to vote in person at the time of completing his application.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, in subsection A, in the first sentence of the second paragraph, deleted “Beginning with the general election in November 1999” at the beginning and “global information system known as the” preceding “Internet”; and added the last paragraph in subdivision B 1.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 438 substituted “no later than 5:00 p.m. on the seventh day” for “not less than five days” in the last sentence of subdivision B 2.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 315 inserted “the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number” near the beginning of subdivision C 1.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 386, in the second sentence in subdivision C 3, deleted “either” following “address given shall be” at the beginning, inserted clauses (i) and (ii) designations, added clause (iii) at the end, and made related changes.

The 2008 amendment by c. 425, in subdivision C 6, inserted “or pregnancy” twice and made a related change.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880, in the last paragraph of subsection A, substituted “Unless the applicant is” for “Unless physically”; in subdivison B 1, deleted “physical” before “disability” in the fourth sentence; and in subdivision C 6, substituted “any duly registered person with a disability, as defined in §

24.2-101

,” for “a person” and “disability or illness” for “illness or disability”; and made minor stylistic changes.

Subdivision C 6 is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 405 and 873 are identical, and added subdivision C 13 and made a related change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 244 added subdivision C 14; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 427 and 458 are identical, and in the last paragraph in subdivision B 1, inserted “government” and made minor stylistic changes in the second sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 353 substituted “federal postcard application” for “Federal Post Card Application” twice in subdivision B 2, and substituted “who is on active duty as a member of the uniformed services as defined in §

24.2-452

, the branch” for “who is on active service as a member of the armed forces of the United States or a member of the merchant marine of the United States, the branch” in subdivision C 4.

The 2012 amendment by c. 612 added the fourth paragraph of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 838 and 839 are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph of
subdivision B 1, which formerly read: “An application completed in person shall be made not less than three days prior to the election in which the applicant offers to vote and completed only in the office of the general registrar. The applicant shall sign the application in the presence of a registrar or a member of the electoral board. The applicant shall provide one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

, or if he is unable to present one of the forms of identification listed in that section, he shall sign a statement, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter who he claims to be. An applicant who requires assistance in voting by reason of disability or inability to read or write may request assistance pursuant to §

24.2-649

and be assisted in preparation of this statement in accordance with that section. The provisions of §

24.2-649

regarding persons who are unable to sign shall be followed when assisting an applicant in completing this statement”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 535 deleted “held in towns” following “May general elections” and “held in a town” following “May general election” in the sixth paragraph of subsection A.

The 2013 amendment by c. 620 deleted “and his or the spouse’s rank, grade, or rate, and service identification number” at the end of subdivision C 4; deleted “and address” following “the name” in subdivisions C 5 and 7; substituted “that he is a person with a disability, illness, or pregnancy” for “the nature of the disability, illness, or pregnancy” in subdivision C 6; substituted “his relationship to the family member; or” for “the name of the family member and the nature of his illness or disability; or” in subdivision C 10; deleted “his religion and” following “by his religion” in subdivision C 11; deleted “address of his place of work” following “his business or employer” in subdivision C 13; and deleted “and the name of the party chairman or candidate who designated him” at the end of subdivision C 14.

The 2013 amendments by c. 725, effective July 1, 2014, deleted the second paragraph of subdivision B 1, which read: “For federal elections held after January 1, 2004, this paragraph shall apply in the case of any voter who is required by subparagraph (b) of 42 U.S.C.S. § 15483 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to show identification the first time that voter votes in a federal election in the state. After completing an application for an absentee ballot in person, such voter shall present (i) a current and valid photo identification or (ii) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter. Such individual who desires to vote in person but who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subdivision shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. Neither the identification requirements of subsection B of §

24.2-643

, nor the identification requirements of subsection A of §

24.2-653

, shall apply to such voter at that election. The State Board of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-653

and this section.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 314 substituted “that he has an obligation occasioned by his religion” for “the nature of the obligation” in subdivision C 11.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and in subdivision B 1, deleted “or a member of the electoral board” following “registrar” in the second sentence and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral boards” in the fifth sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 631 added subdivision 15 and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 595 added the second sentence in subdivision C 1.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and in the fourth paragraph of subsection A and subdivisions B 2 and C 2, substituted “subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” for “subdivision 2 of §

24.2-700

”; in the sixth paragraph of subsection A, deleted “general” preceding “elections,” and deleted “except May general elections, and on the Saturday immediately preceding any primary election, May general election, or special election” at the end; in subdivision B 1, deleted “made not less than three days prior to the election in which the applicant offers to vote and” following “shall be,” and substituted “and signed by the applicant” for “The applicant shall sign the application”; added subsection D; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 289, substituted “eleventh day” for “seventh day” in subdivision B 2 (now B 3).

The 2020 amendment by c. 735, substituted “§

24.2-653.01

” for “subsection B of §

24.2-653

” in subdivision B 1.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1064 and 1065 are nearly identical, and in subdivision B 1, inserted “or if he is unable to present one of the specified forms of identification listed in that subsection, he shall sign a statement, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be” in the second sentence, added the third and fourth sentences, and inserted “or does not sign this statement” in the last sentence of the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the first and second paragraphs, inserted “or

24.2-703.1

” in the first sentence of the third paragraph, and substituted “covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “person who is qualified to vote absentee under subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” in the fourth paragraph; rewrote subdivision B 2, and added subdivision B 3; deleted “and the reason the applicant will be absent or cannot vote at his polling place on the day of the election” at the end of the first sentence in subdivision C 1, substituted “covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “person who makes application under subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” in the last sentence in subdivision C 2, and deleted former subdivisions C 4 through C 15; and substituted “pursuant to §

24.2-701.1

” for “during the period beginning on the second Saturday immediately preceding the election in which he is offering to vote” in subsection D.

§ 24.2-701.1.
Absentee voting in person.

Absentee voting in person shall be available on the forty-fifth day prior to any election and shall continue until 5:00 p.m. on the Saturday immediately preceding the election. In the case of a special election, excluding for federal offices, if time is insufficient between the issuance of the writ calling for the special election and the date of the special election, absentee voting in person shall be available as soon as possible after the issuance of the writ.

Any registered voter offering to vote absentee in person shall provide his name and his residence address in the county or city in which he is offering to vote. After verifying that the voter is a registered voter of that county or city, the general registrar shall enroll the voter’s name and address on the absentee voter applicant list maintained pursuant to §

24.2-706

.

Except as provided in subsection F, a registered voter voting by absentee ballot in person shall provide one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

. If he does not show one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

, he shall be allowed to vote after signing a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be. A voter who requires assistance in voting by reason of a physical disability or an inability to read or write, and who requests assistance pursuant to §

24.2-649

, may be assisted in preparation of this statement in accordance with that section. The provisions of §

24.2-649

regarding voters who are unable to sign shall be followed when assisting a voter in completing this statement. A voter who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection or does not sign this statement shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. The State Board shall provide instructions to the general registrar for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to §

24.2-653

.01 and this section.

Absentee voting in person shall be available during regular business hours. The electoral board of each county and city shall provide for absentee voting in person in the office of the general registrar or a voter satellite office established pursuant to §

24.2-701.2

. For purposes of this chapter, such offices shall be open to the public a minimum of eight hours between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on the first and second Saturday immediately preceding all elections. The electoral board or general registrar may provide for absentee voting in person in such offices on Sundays. Any applicant who is in line to cast his ballot when the office of the general registrar or voter satellite office closes shall be permitted to cast his absentee ballot that day.

The general registrar may provide for the casting of absentee ballots in person pursuant to this section on voting systems. The Department shall prescribe the procedures for use of voting systems. The procedures shall provide for absentee voting in person on voting systems that have been certified and are currently approved by the State Board. The procedures shall be applicable and uniformly applied by the Department to all localities using comparable voting systems.

At least two officers of election shall be present during all hours that absentee voting in person is available and shall represent the two major political parties, except in the case of a party primary, when they may represent the party conducting the primary. However, such requirement shall not apply when (i) voting systems that are being used pursuant to subsection C are located in the office of the general registrar or voter satellite office and (ii) the general registrar or a deputy registrar is present.

The Department shall include absentee ballots voted in person in its instructions for the preparation, maintenance, and reporting of ballots, pollbooks, records, and returns.

This subsection shall apply in the case of any individual who is required by subparagraph (b) of 52 U.S.C. § 21083 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to show identification the first time he votes in a federal election in the state. At such election, such individual shall present (i) a current and valid photo identification or (ii) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter. Such individual who desires to vote in person but who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. The identification requirements of subsection B of §

24.2-643

and subsection A of §

24.2-653

shall not apply to such voter at such election. The Department of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to §

24.2-653

.01 and this section.

History.

2019, cc. 278, 668, 669; 2020, cc. 735, 856, 1064, 1065, 1149, 1151, 1201; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 204; 2022, c. 140.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669 rewrote parts of former §

24.2-707

as this section. Acts 2019, c. 278, amended
former §

24.2-707

, but since the text amended was rewritten as part of this section, the amendment has been given effect in this section, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, by adding the last sentence in subsection B.

Acts 2019,
cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

Acts 2019,
cc. 668 and 669, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Board of Elections, on or before December 1, 2019, shall submit a report to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections on the procedures and instructions promulgated by it for conducting absentee voting pursuant to the provisions of this act. The report shall include recommendations to be considered by the General Assembly for any further legislation that may be necessary for implementation of the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1064 and 1065, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, cc.
1149, 1151, and 1201 also added a sentence to subsection C, which was added to §

24.2-701.2

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 278 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735, substituted “§

24.2-653.01

” for “subsection B of §

24.2-653

” in the last sentence of the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2020 amendment by c. 856, in subsection B, added “or a voter satellite office established pursuant to §

24.2-701.2

” to the second sentence, inserted “to the public” in the third sentence and substituted “voter satellite office” for “location being used for in-person absentee voting” in the last sentence; inserted subsection C and redesignated existing provisions accordingly and in subsection D, clause (i), substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” and added “or voter satellite office.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1064 and 1065 are identical, and in the third paragraph of subsection A, inserted “Except as provided in subsection F” in the first sentence; inserted “allowed to vote after signing a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be” in the second sentence, added the third and fourth sentences, and inserted “A voter who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection or does not sign this statement shall be” in the fifth sentence; and added subsection F.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and added the second sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A; deleted former subdivision A 1, which read: “Any registered voter eligible to vote absentee pursuant to subsection A of §

24.2-700

may vote absentee in person beginning on the forty-fifth day prior to the election in which he is offering to vote and continuing until the second Friday immediately preceding such election. He shall complete the application for an absentee ballot required by §

24.2-701

, and the general registrar shall process that application in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-706

”; and substituted “offering to vote absentee in person shall” for “may vote absentee in person on or after the second Saturday immediately preceding the election in which he is offering to vote. He” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 204, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, substituted “offices” for “office” in the third sentence, and inserted the fourth sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 140 substituted “a deputy” for “an assistant” in subsection D.